Hawaii statutes.
[PART IV.] GREEN INFRASTRUCTURE LOANS

[§196-61] Definitions. As used in this part:

"Authority" means
the Hawaii green infrastructure authority as established under section 196-63.

"Bond" means any bond, note, and other evidence of indebtedness
that is issued by the State pursuant to part X of chapter 269.

"Clean energy technology" means any
technology as defined in section 269-121(b).

"Department" means the department of
business, economic development, and tourism, or any successor by law.

"Director" means
the director of business, economic development, and tourism, or the director's
designee.

"Financing order" means the same as
defined in section 269-161.

"Financing party" means the same as
defined in section 269-161.

"Green infrastructure bond fund"
means the special fund created pursuant to section 196-67.

"Green infrastructure
charge" means the on-bill charges for the use and services of the
loan program, including the repayment of loans made under the loan program, as authorized by the public utilities commission to be imposed on
electric utility customers.

"Green infrastructure
costs" means costs incurred or to be incurred by the electric utility
customers to pay for clean energy technology, demand response technology, and
energy use reduction and demand side management infrastructure including,
without limitation, the purchase or installation of green infrastructure
equipment, programs, and services authorized by the loan program.

"Green infrastructure
equipment" means infrastructure improvements, equipment, and personal
property to be installed to deploy clean energy technology, demand response
technology, and energy use reduction and demand side management infrastructure.

"Green infrastructure fee" means the
same as defined in section 269-161.

"Green infrastructure loan program
order" means the same as defined in section 269-161.

"Green infrastructure property" means
the same as defined in section 269-161.

"Green infrastructure special fund"
means the special fund created pursuant to section 196-65.

"Loan program" and "green infrastructure loans" means the
program established by this part and loans made to
finance the purchase or installation of green infrastructure equipment for
clean energy technology, demand response technology, and energy use reduction
and demand side management infrastructure, programs, and services as authorized
by the public utilities commission using the proceeds of bonds or other
proceeds. [L 2013, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next